North Carolina, session 2025, SB329.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Assembly finds:
(1) The proposed South Fork Passage Trail corridor offers numerous economic
benefits by expanding and enhancing the existing tourism industry. The
diverse hydrology of the river in the corridor includes shoals, flatwater, class
II rapids, and river tributaries that support a variety of recreational uses.
*S329-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The South Fork Passage Trail corridor is home to Spencer Mountain, the third
highest peak in the Charlotte region, and the corridor passes through terrain
that is emblematic of the Piedmont region of the State.
(3) The South Fork Passage Trail corridor also contains ecologically important
habitat, including diverse wetlands, hardwood forests, and grasslands, that
supports numerous State and federal threatened or endangered species.
(4) The creation of a 60-mile hiking and paddling trail connecting Jacob Fork
Park in Catawba County through Betty G. Ross Park in Lincoln County to
George Poston Park, Goat Island Park, and Daniel Stowe Botanical Garden in
Gaston County would expand existing recreational offerings and support
ongoing efforts to conserve the South Fork of the Catawba River watershed.
SECTION 2. The General Assembly authorizes the Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources (Department) to add the South Fork Passage Trail in Catawba, Lincoln, and
Gaston Counties to the State Parks System as a State trail, as provided in G.S. 143B-135.54(b).
The trail, which will run alongside the South Fork River, shall begin at the confluence of the
Henry Fork and Jacob Fork at Jacob Fork Park and end at the boundary between the State and
South Carolina on Lake Wylie.
SECTION 3. The Department shall support, promote, encourage, and facilitate the
establishment of trail segments on State Park lands and on lands of other federal, State, local, and
private landowners. On segments of the South Fork Passage State Trail that cross property
controlled by agencies or owners other than the Department's Division of Parks and Recreation,
the laws, rules, and policies of those agencies or owners shall govern the use of the property.
SECTION 4. The requirement of G.S. 143B-135.54(b) that additions be
accompanied by adequate appropriations for land acquisition, development, and operations shall
not apply to the authorization set forth in this act; provided, however, that the State may receive
donations of appropriate land and may purchase other needed lands for the South Fork Passage
State Trail with existing funds in the Land and Water Fund, the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund,
the Complete the Trails Fund, the federal Land and Water Conservation Fund, and other available
sources of funding.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 329-First Edition